Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8310.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-18-83 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-18 entitled "Accident
and Sickness Insurance Policies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-18-83. Healthcare provider credentialing.
(a) For applications received on or after January 1, 2018, a healthcare entity or health plan
operating in the state shall be required to issue a decision regarding the credentialing of a healthcare
provider as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-five (45) thirty (30) calendar days after the
date of receipt of a complete credentialing application. For any provider already credentialed with
Medicare, the timeline shall be ten (10) business days.
(b) For minor changes to the demographic information of an individual healthcare provider
who is already credentialed with a particular healthcare entity or health plan, such healthcare entity
or health plan shall complete such change within seven (7) five (5) business days of receipt of the
healthcare provider’s request. Minor changes to demographic information requested by individual
providers shall be submitted in the timeframe, and manner required by the healthcare entity or
health plan, and shall include all supporting documentation required by the particular healthcare
entity or health plan. For purposes of this section, minor changes to the information profile of a
healthcare provider shall include, but not be limited to, changes of address and changes to a
healthcare provider’s tax identification number.
(c) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall establish a written standard defining what

elements constitute a complete credentialing application and shall distribute this standard with the
written version of the credentialing application and make such standard available on the healthcare
entity’s or health plan’s website. If the payer fails to meet the timeline in subsection (a) of this
section, the provider shall be deemed provisionally credentialed, and the payer shall reimburse the
provider retroactively for all covered services rendered from the date the completed application
was received.
(d) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall respond to inquiries by the applicant
regarding the status of an application.
(1) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall provide the applicant with automated
application status updates, at least once every fifteen (15) calendar days, informing the applicant of
any missing application materials until the application is deemed complete;
(2) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall inform the applicant within five (5) business
days that the credentialing application is complete; and
(3) If the healthcare entity or health plan denies a credentialing application, the healthcare
entity or health plan shall notify the healthcare provider in writing and shall provide the healthcare
provider with any and all reasons for denying the credentialing application.
(e) The effective date for billing privileges for healthcare providers under a particular
healthcare entity or health plan shall be the next business day following the date of approval of the
credentialing application.
(f) For applications received from resident graduates on or after January 1, 2018, a
healthcare entity or health plan shall offer a transitional or conditional approval process such that a
resident graduate who has submitted an otherwise complete application and met all other criteria,
may be conditionally approved, effective upon successful graduation from the training program.
(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) “Complete credentialing application” means all the requested material has been
submitted.
(2) “Date of receipt” means the date the healthcare entity or health plan receives the
completed credentialing application whether via electronic submission or as a paper application.
(3) “Healthcare entity” means a licensed insurance company or nonprofit hospital or
medical or dental service corporation or plan or health maintenance organization, or a contractor
as defined in § 23-17.13-2 [repealed] that operates a health plan.
(4) “Healthcare provider” means a healthcare professional.
(5) “Health plan” means a plan operated by a healthcare entity that provides for the delivery
of healthcare services to persons enrolled in those plans through:
LC006085 - Page 2 of 9

(i) Arrangements with selected providers to furnish healthcare services; and
(ii) Financial incentives for persons enrolled in the plan to use the participating providers
and procedures provided for by the health plan.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this
chapter and may impose administrative penalties consistent with its existing authority under title
27. Non-compliant contract provisions are void. The commissioner shall adopt rules and
regulations to implement this chapter and shall require payers to submit quarterly reports on
credentialing timelines.
SECTION 2. Section 27-19-74 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-19 entitled "Nonprofit
Hospital Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-19-74. Healthcare provider credentialing.
(a) For applications received on or after January 1, 2018, a healthcare entity or health plan
operating in the state shall be required to issue a decision regarding the credentialing of a healthcare
provider as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-five (45) thirty (30) calendar days after the
date of receipt of a complete credentialing application. For any provider already credentialed with
Medicare, the timeline shall be ten (10) business days.
(b) For minor changes to the demographic information of an individual healthcare provider
who is already credentialed with a particular healthcare entity or health plan, such healthcare entity
or health plan shall complete such change within seven (7) five (5) business days of receipt of the
healthcare provider’s request. Minor changes to demographic information requested by individual
providers shall be submitted in the timeframe, and manner required by the healthcare entity or
health plan, and shall include all supporting documentation required by the particular healthcare
entity or health plan. For purposes of this section, minor changes to the information profile of a
healthcare provider shall include, but not be limited to, changes of address and changes to a
healthcare provider’s tax identification number.
(c) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall establish a written standard defining what
elements constitute a complete credentialing application and shall distribute this standard with the
written version of the credentialing application and make such standard available on the healthcare
entity’s or health plan’s website. If the payer fails to meet the timeline in subsection (a) of this
section, the provider shall be deemed provisionally credentialed, and the payer shall reimburse the
provider retroactively for all covered services rendered from the date the completed application
was received.
(d) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall respond to inquiries by the applicant
regarding the status of an application.
LC006085 - Page 3 of 9

(1) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall provide the applicant with automated
application status updates, at least once every fifteen (15) calendar days, informing the applicant of
any missing application materials until the application is deemed complete;
(2) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall inform the applicant within five (5) business
days that the credentialing application is complete; and
(3) If the healthcare entity or health plan denies a credentialing application, the healthcare
entity or health plan shall notify the healthcare provider in writing and shall provide the healthcare
provider with any and all reasons for denying the credentialing application.
(e) The effective date for billing privileges for healthcare providers under a particular
healthcare entity or health plan shall be the next business day following the date of approval of the
credentialing application.
(f) For applications received from resident graduates on or after January 1, 2018, a
healthcare entity or health plan shall offer a transitional or conditional approval process such that a
resident graduate who has submitted an otherwise complete application and met all other criteria,
may be conditionally approved, effective upon successful graduation from the training program.
(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) “Complete credentialing application” means all the requested material has been
submitted.
(2) “Date of receipt” means the date the healthcare entity or health plan receives the
completed credentialing application whether via electronic submission or as a paper application.
(3) “Healthcare entity” means a licensed insurance company or nonprofit hospital or
medical or dental service corporation or plan or health maintenance organization, or a contractor
as defined in § 23-17.13-2 [repealed] that operates a health plan.
(4) “Healthcare provider” means a healthcare professional.
(5) “Health plan” means a plan operated by a healthcare entity that provides for the delivery
of healthcare services to persons enrolled in those plans through:
(i) Arrangements with selected providers to furnish healthcare services; and
(ii) Financial incentives for persons enrolled in the plan to use the participating providers
and procedures provided for by the health plan.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this
chapter and may impose administrative penalties consistent with its existing authority under title
27. Non-compliant contract provisions are void. The commissioner shall adopt rules and
regulations to implement this chapter and shall require payers to submit quarterly reports on
credentialing timelines.
LC006085 - Page 4 of 9

SECTION 3. Section 27-20-70 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20 entitled "Nonprofit
Medical Service Corporations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20-70. Healthcare provider credentialing.
(a) For applications received on or after January 1, 2018, a healthcare entity or health plan
operating in the state shall be required to issue a decision regarding the credentialing of a healthcare
provider as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-five (45) thirty (30) calendar days after the
date of receipt of a complete credentialing application. For any provider already credentialed with
Medicare, the timeline shall be ten (10) business days.
(b) For minor changes to the demographic information of an individual healthcare provider
who is already credentialed with a particular healthcare entity or health plan, the healthcare entity
or health plan shall complete the change within seven (7) five (5) business days of receipt of the
healthcare provider’s request. Minor changes to demographic information requested by individual
providers shall be submitted in the timeframe, and manner required by the healthcare entity or
health plan, and shall include all supporting documentation required by the particular healthcare
entity or health plan. For purposes of this section, minor changes to the information profile of a
healthcare provider shall include, but not be limited to, changes of address and changes to a
healthcare provider’s tax identification number.
(c) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall establish a written standard defining what
elements constitute a complete credentialing application and shall distribute this standard with the
written version of the credentialing application and make the standard available on the healthcare
entity’s or health plan’s website. If the payer fails to meet the timeline in subsection (a) of this
section, the provider shall be deemed provisionally credentialed, and the payer shall reimburse the
provider retroactively for all covered services rendered from the date the completed application
was received.
(d) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall respond to inquiries by the applicant
regarding the status of an application.
(1) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall provide the applicant with automated
application status updates, at least once every fifteen (15) calendar days, informing the applicant of
any missing application materials until the application is deemed complete;
(2) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall inform the applicant within five (5) business
days that the credentialing application is complete; and
(3) If the healthcare entity or health plan denies a credentialing application, the healthcare
entity or health plan shall notify the healthcare provider in writing and shall provide the healthcare
provider with any and all reasons for denying the credentialing application.
LC006085 - Page 5 of 9

(e) The effective date for billing privileges for healthcare providers under a particular
healthcare entity or health plan shall be the next business day following the date of approval of the
credentialing application.
(f) For applications received from resident graduates on or after January 1, 2018, a
healthcare entity or health plan shall offer a transitional or conditional approval process such that a
resident graduate who has submitted an otherwise complete application and met all other criteria,
may be conditionally approved, effective upon successful graduation from the training program.
(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(1) “Complete credentialing application” means all the requested material has been
submitted.
(2) “Date of receipt” means the date the healthcare entity or health plan receives the
completed credentialing application whether via electronic submission or as a paper application.
(3) “Healthcare entity” means a licensed insurance company or nonprofit hospital or
medical or dental service corporation or plan or health maintenance organization, or a contractor
as defined in § 23-17.13-2 [repealed] that operates a health plan.
(4) “Healthcare provider” means a healthcare professional.
(5) “Health plan” means a plan operated by a healthcare entity that provides for the delivery
of healthcare services to persons enrolled in those plans through:
(i) Arrangements with selected providers to furnish healthcare services; and
(ii) Financial incentives for persons enrolled in the plan to use the participating providers
and procedures provided for by the health plan.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this
chapter and may impose administrative penalties consistent with its existing authority under title
27. Non-compliant contract provisions are void. The commissioner shall adopt rules and
regulations to implement this chapter and shall require payers to submit quarterly reports on
credentialing timelines.
SECTION 4. Section 27-41-87 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-41 entitled "Health
Maintenance Organizations" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-41-87. Healthcare provider credentialing.
(a) For applications received on or after January 1, 2018, a healthcare entity or health plan
operating in the state shall be required to issue a decision regarding the credentialing of a healthcare
provider as soon as practicable, but no later than forty-five (45) thirty (30) calendar days after the
date of receipt of a complete credentialing application. For any provider already credentialed with
Medicare, the timeline shall be ten (10) business days.
LC006085 - Page 6 of 9

(b) For minor changes to the demographic information of an individual healthcare provider
who is already credentialed with a particular healthcare entity or health plan, the healthcare entity
or health plan shall complete the change within seven (7) five (5) business days of receipt of the
healthcare provider’s request. Minor changes to demographic information requested by individual
providers shall be submitted in the time frame, and manner required by the healthcare entity or
health plan, and shall include all supporting documentation required by the particular healthcare
entity or health plan. For purposes of this section, minor changes to the information profile of a
healthcare provider shall include, but not be limited to, changes of address and changes to a
healthcare provider’s tax identification number.
(c) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall establish a written standard defining what
elements constitute a complete credentialing application and shall distribute this standard with the
written version of the credentialing application and make the standard available on the healthcare
entity’s or health plan’s website. If the payer fails to meet the timeline in subsection (a) of this
section, the provider shall be deemed provisionally credentialed, and the payer shall reimburse the
provider retroactively for all covered services rendered from the date the completed application
was received.
(d) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall respond to inquiries by the applicant
regarding the status of an application.
(1) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall provide the applicant with automated
application status updates, at least once every fifteen (15) calendar days, informing the applicant of
any missing application materials until the application is deemed complete;
(2) Each healthcare entity or health plan shall inform the applicant within five (5) business
days that the credentialing application is complete; and
(3) If the healthcare entity or health plan denies a credentialing application, the healthcare
entity or health plan shall notify the healthcare provider in writing and shall provide the healthcare
provider with any and all reasons for denying the credentialing application.
(e) The effective date for billing privileges for healthcare providers under a particular
healthcare entity or health plan shall be the next business day following the date of approval of the
credentialing application.
(f) For applications received from resident graduates on or after January 1, 2018, a
healthcare entity or health plan shall offer a transitional or conditional approval process such that a
resident graduate who has submitted an otherwise complete application and met all other criteria,
may be conditionally approved, effective upon successful graduation from the training program.
(g) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
LC006085 - Page 7 of 9

(1) “Complete credentialing application” means all the requested material has been
submitted.
(2) “Date of receipt” means the date the healthcare entity or health plan receives the
completed credentialing application whether via electronic submission or as a paper application.
(3) “Healthcare entity” means a licensed insurance company or nonprofit hospital or
medical or dental service corporation or plan or health maintenance organization, or a contractor
as defined in § 23-17.13-2 [repealed] that operates a health plan.
(4) “Healthcare provider” means a healthcare professional.
(5) “Health plan” means a plan operated by a healthcare entity that provides for the delivery
of healthcare services to persons enrolled in those plans through:
(i) Arrangements with selected providers to furnish healthcare services; and
(ii) Financial incentives for persons enrolled in the plan to use the participating providers
and procedures provided for by the health plan.
(h) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this
chapter and may impose administrative penalties consistent with its existing authority under title
27. Non-compliant contract provisions are void. The commissioner shall adopt rules and
regulations to implement this chapter and shall require payers to submit quarterly reports on
credentialing timelines.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006085
========
LC006085 - Page 8 of 9